Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6111
Appeal from the final order.

Any person affected by a final order issued pursuant to the Insurers Demutualization Act shall have the right to appeal such order to the district court of Lancaster County. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 51.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.